South Dakota, session 2026, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-9:
No municipality may create a district unless the board of county commissioners of
each county in which the district is located, either in whole or in part, has consented to
the creation of the district by resolution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.